New York, session 2025-2026, S4869.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Paragraph (b) of subdivision 4 of section 502 of the vehi- 2 cle and traffic law, as amended by chapter 379 of the laws of 2022, is 3 amended and a new paragraph (i) is added to read as follows: 4 (b) Upon successful completion of the requirements set forth in para- 5 graph (a) of this subdivision which shall include an alcohol and drug 6 education component as described in paragraph (c) of this subdivision, a 7 "Road Rage" awareness component as described in paragraph (c-1) of this 8 subdivision, a "Work Zone Safety" awareness component as described in 9 paragraph (c-2) of this subdivision, a "Motorcycle Safety" awareness 10 component as described in paragraph (c-3) of this subdivision, a "School 11 Bus Safety" awareness component as described in paragraph (c-4) of this 12 subdivision, [and] a "Pedestrian and Bicyclist Safety" awareness compo- 13 nent as described in paragraph (c-5) of this subdivision, and instruc- 14 tion in the laws relating to parking spaces for the handicapped as 15 described in paragraph (i) of this subdivision, the commissioner shall 16 cause the applicant to take a road test in a representative vehicle of a 17 type prescribed by the commissioner which shall be appropriate to the 18 type of license for which application is made, except that the commis- 19 sioner may waive the road test requirements for certain classes of 20 applicants. Provided, however, that the term "representative vehicle" 21 shall not include a three-wheeled motor vehicle that has two wheels 22 situated in the front and one wheel in the rear, has a steering mech- 23 anism and seating which does not require the operator to straddle or sit 24 astride, is equipped with safety belts for all occupants and is manufac- 25 tured to comply with federal motor vehicle safety standards for motorcy- EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD09496-01-5 S. 4869 2 1 cles including, but not limited to, 49 C.F.R. part 571. The commissioner 2 shall have the power to establish a program to allow persons other than 3 employees of the department to conduct road tests in representative 4 vehicles when such tests are required for applicants to obtain a class 5 A, B or C license. If [she] the commissioner chooses to do so, [she] the 6 commissioner shall set forth [her] the commissioner's reasons in writing 7 and conduct a public hearing on the matter. [She] The commissioner shall 8 only establish such a program after holding the public hearing. 9 (i) The commissioner shall provide in the pre-licensing course, set 10 forth in paragraph (b) of this subdivision a mandatory component in 11 education of the laws relating to handicapped accessible parking. 12 § 2. This act shall take effect on the one hundred twentieth day after 13 it shall have become a law.